Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2912
Physical therapist, defined.

Physical therapist means a person licensed to practice physical therapy under the Physical Therapy Practice Act.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 130;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,374;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1005.